Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2213
Officer, shareholder, agent, or employee; legally disqualified; effect.

If any officer, shareholder, agent, or employee of a corporation organized under sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 who has been rendering professional service to the public becomes legally disqualified to render such professional service within this state, or accepts employment that, pursuant to existing law, places restrictions or limitations upon his continued rendering of such professional services, he shall sever all employment with, and financial interests in, such corporation forthwith. A corporation's failure to require compliance with this provision shall constitute a ground for the forfeiture of its articles of incorporation and its dissolution.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 13, p. 558.